nb: Båtkrok flytekraft: Flyter ikke; Flyter; Flyter med flytetilbehør; Annet
de: Schwimmfähigkeit des Bootshakens: Nicht schwimmfähig; Schwimmfähig; Schwimmfähig mit Auftriebskörper; Sonstige
sl-SI: Plovnost kavljev za čolne: Ne plava; Plava; Plava z nastavkom za plovnost; Drugo
th: การลอยตัวของตะขอเกี่ยวเรือ: ไม่ลอยน้ำ; ลอยน้ำ; ลอยน้ำด้วยอุปกรณ์ช่วยลอยตัว; อื่นๆ
el: Πλευστότητα με γάντζο σκάφους: Δεν επιπλέει; Επιπλέει; Επιπλέει με εξάρτημα πλευστότητας; Άλλο
pt-PT: Flutuação do gancho do barco: Não flutua; Flutua; Flutua com acessório de flutuação; Outro
en: Boat hook flotation: Does not float; Floats; Floats with flotation attachment; Other
ro-RO: Flotarea cârligului bărcii: Nu plutește; Plutește; Plutește cu accesoriu de flotație; Altele
ko: 보트 후크 부력: 물에 뜨지 않음; 물에 뜸; 부력재 장착 시 물에 뜸; 기타
zh-TW: 船鉤浮力: 不浮水; 浮水; 裝有浮具配件可浮水; 其他
sk-SK: Flotácia bidla: Nepláva; Pláva; Pláva s plavákovým nadstavcom; Iné
cs: Schopnost lodního háku držet se na hladině (vztlak): Neplave; Plave; Plave s plovacím nástavcem; Jiné
da: Bådshagens flydeevne: Flyder ikke; Flyder; Flyder med flydeudstyr; Andet
hu: Csáklya úszóképessége: Nem lebeg; Lebeg; Felhajtóerő-kiegészítővel lebeg; Egyéb
nl: Boothaakdrijfvermogen: Drijft niet; Drijft; Drijft met drijfhulpmiddel; Overige
it: galleggiante a gancio per barca: Non galleggia; Galleggia; Galleggia con accessorio di galleggiamento; Altro
lt-LT: Laivo kablys su plūduru: Neplūduriuoja; Plūduriuoja; Plūduriuoja su plūduriuojančiu priedu; Kitas
bg-BG: Плавателност на куката за лодка: Не плава; Плава; Плава с приставка за плаваемост; Друго
pl: Pływalność bosaka: Nie unosi się; Unosi się; Unosi się z doczepianym pływakiem; Inne
es: Flotabilidad del bichero: No flota; Flota; Flota con accesorio de flotación; Otro
fi: Venehaan kellunta: Ei kellu; Kelluva; Kelluu kelluntalisäosalla; Muu
zh-CN: 船钩漂浮性: 不漂浮; 漂浮; 带漂浮附件时可漂浮; 其他
tr: Tekne çengeli yüzebilirliği: Yüzmez; Yüzer; Yüzdürme eklentisiyle yüzer; Diğer
hr-HR: Plutanje na udici za brodove: Ne pluta; Pluta; Pluta s dodatkom za plutanje; Ostalo
ru: Плавучесть багра: Не обладает плавучестью; Плавучий; Плавучий с поплавком; Другое
sv: Båtkrokflytning: Flyter inte; Flyter; Flyter med flyttillbehör; Annan
fr: Flottabilité de la gaffe: Ne flotte pas; Flotte; Flotte avec accessoire de flottaison; Autre
vi: Khả năng nổi của móc thuyền: Không nổi; Nổi; Nổi nhờ phụ kiện phao; Khác
pt-BR: Flutuação do gancho do barco: Não flutua; Flutua; Flutua com acessório de flutuação; Outros
ja: ボートフックの浮力: 浮かない; 浮く; フロートアタッチメントで浮く; その他